Arkansas, session 2025, SB646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 3 is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
17-3-105. Prohibited disqualification from licensure.
An individual shall not be disqualified from pursuing, practicing, or
engaging in any occupation or profession for which licensure is required
solely or in part because of a prior conviction of a crime, unless the crime
for which the individual was convicted directly relates to the duties and
responsibilities of the occupation or profession.



*LGL192*
04/15/2025 4:01:11 PM LGL192